Wisconsin, session 2025, AB930.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Financial Institutions and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.AB930,11Section 1. 203.02 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB930,2,32203.02 (3) The division has the same power to conduct hearings, take 3testimony, and secure evidence as is provided in ss. 217.17 and 217.18 s. 217.11.Note: This Section deletes cross-references to two statutory sections that were recodified and replaces them with the updated statutory citation.AB930,2,44